California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
 pay over the tax, or (B) fails to make deposits, payments, or returns of the tax, and(2) Is notified, by notice delivered in hand or by registered mail of the failure, then all the requirements of subdivision (b) shall be complied with. In the case of a corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or trust, notice to an officer, partner, manager, member, or trustee, shall, for purposes of this section, be deemed to be sufficient notice to the corporation, partnership, limited liability company, or trust and to all officers, partners, managers, members, trustees, and employees thereof.

(b) Any person or employer who is required to collect, account for, and pay over any tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), if
 notice has been delivered to that person or employer in accordance with subdivision (a), shall collect the taxes, which become collectible after delivery of the notice, shall (not later than the end of the second banking day after any amount of the taxes is collected) deposit that amount in a separate account in a bank located within the limits of this state, and shall keep the amount of those taxes in that account until payment over to the Franchise Tax Board. The account shall be designated as a special fund in trust for the Franchise Tax Board, payable to the Franchise Tax Board by that person or employer as trustee.

(c) Whenever the Franchise Tax Board is satisfied, with respect to any notification made under subdivision (a), that all requirements of law and regulations with respect to the taxes, will henceforth be complied with, it may cancel the notification. The cancellation shall take effect at the time as is specified in the notice of
 the cancellation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19010.

Unless otherwise provided, any provision of this part that relates to the assessment and collection of tax shall also apply to the assessment and collection of estimated tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19011.

(a) All payments required under this part, regardless of the taxable year to which the payments apply shall be remitted to the Franchise Tax Board by electronic funds transfer pursuant to Division 11 (commencing with Section 11101) of the Commercial Code, once any of the following conditions are met:

(1) With respect to any corporation, any installment payment of estimated tax made pursuant to Section 19025 or the payment made pursuant to Section 18604 with regard to an
 extension of time to file exceeds fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1991, or exceeds twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1995.

(2) With respect to any corporation, the total tax liability exceeds two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1991, or exceeds eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 1995. For purposes of this section, total tax liability shall be the total tax liability as shown on the original return, after any adjustment made pursuant to Section 19051.

(3) A taxpayer submits a request to the Franchise Tax Board and is granted permission to make electronic funds transfers.

(b) A taxpayer required to remit
 payments to the Franchise Tax Board by electronic funds transfer may elect to discontinue making payments where the threshold requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) were not met for the preceding taxable year. The election shall be made in a form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) Any taxpayer required to remit payment by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section who makes payment by other means shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount paid, unless it is shown that the failure to make payment as required was for reasonable cause and was not the result of willful neglect.

(d) Any taxpayer required to remit payments by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section may request a waiver of those requirements from the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board may grant a waiver only if it determines that the
 particular amounts paid in excess of the threshold amounts established in this section were not representative of the taxpayer’s tax liability. If a taxpayer is granted a waiver, subsequent remittances by electronic funds transfer shall be required only on those terms set forth in the waiver.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board shall accept remittances by electronic funds transfer pursuant to this section no later than January 1, 1993. Electronic funds transfer procedures, in addition to those described in subdivision (f), shall be as prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board. Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated, if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date
 settlement occurs.

(f) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfer shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, automated clearinghouse credit, a Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire), or by an international funds transfer.

(2) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established by agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries
 between banks or bank accounts and that authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between those banks or bank accounts.

(3) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which any department of the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the taxpayer’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of tax. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction by the taxpayer shall be paid by the state.

(4) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the taxpayer, through its own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting its own bank account. Banking costs incurred by the state for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction may be charged to the taxpayer.

(5) “Fedwire” means any transaction originated by the taxpayer and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through federal reserve banks, pursuant to which the taxpayer debits its own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers may be made by Fedwire only if prior approval is obtained from the Franchise Tax Board and the taxpayer is unable, for reasonable cause, to make payments pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4). Banking costs charged to the taxpayer and to the state may be charged to the taxpayer.

(6) “International funds transfer” means any transaction originated by the taxpayer and utilizing the international electronic payment system to transfer funds, pursuant to which the taxpayer debits its own bank account and credits the state’s bank account.

(7) In
 determining whether a payment or total tax liability exceeds the amounts established in subdivision (a), the income of all taxpayers whose income derived from, or attributable to, sources within this state is required to be determined by a combined report shall be aggregated and the total aggregate amount shall be considered to be the income of a single taxpayer for purposes of determining the payment or total tax liability of a single taxpayer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19011.5.

(a) All payments required by an individual under this part, regardless of the taxable year to which the payments apply, made on or after January 1, 2009, shall be electronically remitted to the Franchise Tax Board in the form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board, once any of the following conditions are met by an individual:

(1) Any installment payment of estimated tax made pursuant to this part in excess of twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or any payment
 made pursuant to Section 18567 with regard to an extension of time to file that exceeds twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), for any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2009.

(2) The total tax liability exceeds eighty thousand dollars ($80,000) in any taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2009. For purposes of this section, total tax liability shall be the total tax liability as shown on the original return, after any adjustment made pursuant to Section 19051.

(b) A taxpayer required to electronically remit payment to the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to this section may elect to discontinue making payments electronically where the threshold requirements set forth in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) were not met for the preceding taxable year. The election shall be made in a form and manner prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(c) Any taxpayer required to electronically remit payment pursuant to this section who makes payment by other means shall pay a penalty of 1 percent of the amount paid, unless it is shown that the failure to make payment as required was for reasonable cause and was not the result of willful neglect.

(d) Any taxpayer required to electronically remit payments pursuant to this section may request a waiver of those requirements from the Franchise Tax Board. The Franchise Tax Board may grant a waiver only if it determines that the particular amounts paid in excess of the threshold amounts established in this section were not representative of the taxpayer’s tax liability. If the Franchise Tax Board grants a waiver to a taxpayer, the waiver shall be in writing, and subsequent electronic remittances shall be required only on those terms set forth in the written waiver.

(e) For purposes of this section, Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code shall not apply to any standard, criterion, procedure, determination, rule, notice, or guideline established or issued by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to subdivision (a).

(f) For purposes of this section, both of the following shall apply:

(1) “Electronically remit” means to send payment through use of any of the electronic payment applications provided by the Franchise Tax Board, including, but not limited to, a pay by phone option, when made available by the Franchise Tax Board.

(2) “Pay by phone” means a method that allows a taxpayer to authorize a transfer of funds from a financial institution using telephonic
 technology.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 751, Sec. 67.   Effective September 30, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Banks and Corporations [19021. - 19027.]

19021.

In the case of taxpayers subject to the tax imposed by Article 3 (commencing with Section 23181) of Chapter 2 of Part 11, there shall be due and payable on or before the 15th day of the third month following the close of the preceding year from each taxpayer a percentage of its net income as disclosed by its return which is equal to the rate applicable to corporations subject to the tax imposed by Article 2 (commencing with Section 23151) of Chapter 2 of Part 11 plus the personal property tax rate equivalent included in the bank and financial corporation tax
 rate determination by the Franchise Tax Board pursuant to Sections 23186 and 23186.1. The payment required by this section shall not be less than the minimum tax specified in Section 23153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19023.

For purposes of this article, in the case of a corporation or an organization described in Section 23731, the term “estimated tax” means the amount which the corporation or organization described in Section 23731 estimates as the amount of the tax imposed by Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) and the amount of its liability for the tax of each wholly owned subsidiary under Section 23800.5; but in no event shall the estimated tax of a corporation subject to the tax imposed by Article 2 (commencing with Section 23151) of Chapter 2 of Part 11 be less than
 the minimum tax prescribed in Section 23153.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 185, Sec. 29.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19025.

(a) If the amount of estimated tax does not exceed the minimum tax specified by Section 23153, the entire amount of the estimated tax shall be due and payable on or before the 15th day of the fourth month of the taxable year.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), if the amount of estimated tax exceeds the minimum tax specified by Section 23153, the amount payable shall be paid in installments as follows:If the 
 requirementsThe following percentages of the estimated tax 
shall be paid on the 15th day of the—of this subdivision
 are first met—4th
 month6th
 month9th
 month12th
 monthBefore the 1st day of the 4th month of the taxable year 

30 (but not less than the minimum tax provided in Section 23153 and any tax under Section 23800.5)

40

0

30After the last day of the 3rd month and before the 1st day of the 6th month of the taxable year __60040After the last day of the 5th month and before the 1st day of the 9th month of the taxable year ____7030After the
 last day of the 8th month and before the 1st day of the 12th month of the taxable year ______100(c) If a wholly owned subsidiary is first subject to tax under Section 23800.5 after the last day of the third month of the taxable year of owner, the amount of the next installment of estimated tax under subdivision (b) after the wholly owned subsidiary is subject to tax under Section 23800.5 shall not be less than the amount
 of the tax of the wholly owned subsidiary under Section 23800.5 and an amount equal to that amount shall be due and payable on the date the installment is required to be paid. For purposes of determining which installment is the next installment of estimated tax under subdivision (b), subdivision (b) shall be modified by substituting “includes the tax of a wholly owned subsidiary under Section 23800.5” for “exceeds the minimum tax specified by Section 23153.”

(d) The amendments made to this section by Section 1 of Chapter 1 of the First Extraordinary Session of the Statutes of 2008 shall apply to installments due for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2009, and before January 1, 2010.

(e) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to installments due for each taxable year beginning on or after January 1,
 2010.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 15, Sec. 2.   (AB 17 4x)   Effective October 23, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

19026.

If, after paying any installment of estimated tax required by subdivision (b) of Section 19025, the taxpayer makes a new estimate, the amount of each remaining installment (if any) shall be the amount which would have been payable if the new estimate had been made when the first estimate for the taxable year was made, increased or decreased (as the case may be) by the amount computed by dividing—

(a) The difference between—

(1) The amount of estimated tax required to be paid before the date on which the new estimate is made, and

(2) The amount of estimated tax which would have been required to be paid before that date if the new estimate had been made when the first estimate was made, by

(b) The number of installments remaining to be paid on or after the date on which the new estimate is made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

19027.

The application of this article to taxable years of less than 12 months shall be in accordance with regulations prescribed by the Franchise Tax Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 862, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Deficiency Assessments [19031. - 19067.]

19031.

The Franchise Tax Board may proceed under this article or Article 5 (commencing with Section 19081) whether or not it requires a return as an amended return under Section 18622.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19032.

As soon as practicable after the return is filed, the Franchise Tax Board shall examine it and shall determine the correct amount of the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19033.

(a) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the tax disclosed by the taxpayer on an original or amended return, including an amended return reporting federal adjustments pursuant to Section 18622, is less than the tax disclosed by its examination, it shall mail notice to the taxpayer of the deficiency proposed to be assessed. In no case shall the determination of the deficiency be arbitrary or without foundation.

(b) (1) Except as provided in
 paragraph (2), the Franchise Tax Board, in connection with the determination described in subdivision (a), shall examine the original or amended return or related electronically stored return data.

(2) If the return or return data described in paragraph (1) has been destroyed or cannot be located after reasonable effort, the Franchise Tax Board shall request the taxpayer to provide a paper or electronic copy of the return. If the taxpayer fails to provide a copy within 30 days, which may be extended an additional 30 days for reasonable cause, from the date of the request, paragraph (1) shall not apply.

(c) As used in this section, “electronically stored return data” means an electronic record of line items from an original or amended return and accompanying schedules that is routinely created as a return is processed.

(d) The amendments to this section made by Chapter 414 of the Statutes of 2000 shall apply to notices of deficiencies proposed to be assessed issued on or after January 1, 2001.

(e) The notice described in subdivision (a) shall be mailed in a manner that includes a postmark. For purposes of this subdivision, postmark means a postal marking made on a letter, package, or postcard indicating the date on which the item is delivered to the United States Postal Service.

(f) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to notices of deficiencies proposed to be assessed issued on or after January 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 281, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19034.

(a) Each notice shall set forth the reasons for the proposed deficiency assessment and the computation thereof.

(b) Each notice shall include the date determined by the Franchise Tax Board as the last day on which the taxpayer may file a written protest pursuant to Section 19041. Failure to include this date shall not invalidate a notice that is otherwise valid.

(c) The amendments made by the act adding this
 subdivision shall apply to any notice mailed after December 31, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 10.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19035.

In the case of a joint return filed by spouses, the notice of proposed deficiency assessment may be a single joint notice, except that if the Franchise Tax Board is notified by either spouse that separate residences have been established, it shall mail to each spouse, in lieu of the single joint notice, duplicate originals of the joint notice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 108.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19036.

Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, any interest, penalty or addition to tax, imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part may be assessed and collected in the same manner as if it were a deficiency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19041.

(a) Within 60 days after the mailing of each notice of proposed deficiency assessment the taxpayer may file with the Franchise Tax Board a written protest against the proposed deficiency assessment, specifying in the protest the grounds upon which it is based.

(b) Any protest filed with the Franchise Tax Board on or before the last date specified for filing that protest by the Franchise Tax Board in the notice of proposed deficiency assessment (according to Section 19034)
 shall be treated as timely filed.

(c) The amendments made by the act adding this subdivision shall apply to any notice mailed after December 31, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 11.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19041.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), the provisions of Section 6603 of the Internal Revenue Code, relating to deposits made to suspend the running of interest on potential underpayments, shall apply, except as otherwise provided. A deposit shall not be considered a payment of tax for purposes of filing a claim for refund pursuant to Section 19306, converting an administrative action to an action on a claim pursuant to Section 19335,
 or filing an action pursuant to Section 19384, until either of the following occurs:

(1) The taxpayer provides a written statement to the Franchise Tax Board specifying that the deposit shall be a payment of tax for purposes of Section 19306, 19335, or 19384.

(2) The deposit is used to pay a final tax liability.

(b) Section 6603(d) of the Internal Revenue Code is modified to substitute the phrase “notice of proposed deficiency assessment under Article 3 of Chapter 4 of this part” for “30-day letter” in each place that the phrase “30-day letter” appears.

(c) In the case of any amount held by the Franchise Tax Board as a deposit in the nature of a cash bond pursuant to the provisions of this section prior to the amendments made by the act adding this
 subdivision, the date that the taxpayer identifies that amount as a deposit made pursuant to this section, as amended by the act adding this subdivision, shall be treated as the date that the amount is deposited for purposes of this section, as amended by the act adding this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 691, Sec. 45.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19042.

If no protest is filed, the amount of the proposed deficiency assessment becomes final upon the expiration of the 60-day period provided in Section 19041.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19043.

(a) For purposes of this part, “deficiency” means the amount by which the tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) exceeds the excess of—

(1) The sum of—

(A) The amount shown as the tax by the taxpayer on an original or amended return, if an original or amended return was filed, plus

(B) The amounts previously assessed (or collected without assessment) as a deficiency, over—

(2) The amount of rebates, as defined in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), made.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) The tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) and the tax shown on an original or amended return shall both be determined without regard to payments on account of estimated tax, and without regard to the credit under Section 19002.

(2) “Rebate” means so much of an abatement, credit, refund, or other repayment, as was made on the ground that the tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) was less than the excess of the
 amount specified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) over the rebates previously made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 191, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19043.5.

(a) (1) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of a carryover disclosed by the taxpayer on an original or amended return, including an amended return reporting federal adjustments pursuant to Section 18622, is more than the amount of the carryover disclosed by its own examination, it may mail a notice or notices to the taxpayer of the proposed carryover adjustment and the proposed adjusted carryover amount.

(2) For purposes of this
 section, “carryover” means the amount of a credit, loss, deduction, or other item that is shown on an original or amended return for carry forward to a subsequent taxable year.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of this article applicable to a proposed deficiency assessment shall be applicable to a proposed adjusted carryover amount, including protest and appeal rights as if that proposed adjusted carryover amount were a proposed deficiency assessment.

(c) (1) A proposed adjusted carryover amount shall become a final adjusted carryover amount under this section following a determination of the board regarding that proposed adjusted carryover amount that becomes final pursuant to the provisions of Section 19048.

(2) A final adjusted carryover amount shall be binding
 and conclusive with respect to the amount of that carryover for purposes of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), except in the following circumstances:

(A) In the event of fraud, malfeasance, or misrepresentation of a material fact.

(B) Subject to any provision of the Revenue and Taxation Code that expressly provides that effect be given to that provision notwithstanding any other law or rule of law.

(C) Subject to any law that is, or becomes, operative with respect to a taxable year affected by the final adjusted carryover amount.

(D) Subject to any final federal adjustment that is made with respect to the taxpayer’s federal income tax liability for a taxable year affected by the final
 adjusted carryover amount.

(E) In an action brought pursuant to provisions of Section 19382.

(d) (1) In any case where there is a final adjusted carryover amount with respect to a carryover, the taxpayer shall report that final adjusted carryover amount on an original or amended return for any subsequent year.

(2) If a taxpayer fails to comply with paragraph (1), then any adjustment required to make the amount of the carryover shown on the return for any year consistent with the final adjusted carryover amount shall be treated as arising out of a mathematical error and assessed and collected under Section 19051.

(e) Except as provided in subdivision (c), this section shall not affect the determination, issuance, assessment,
 collection, or validity of a deficiency assessment under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 191, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19044.

(a) If a protest is filed, the Franchise Tax Board shall reconsider the assessment of the deficiency and, if the taxpayer has so requested in his or her protest, shall grant the taxpayer or his or her authorized representatives an oral hearing. Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code does not apply to a hearing under this subdivision.

(b) The Franchise Tax Board may act on the protest in whole or in part. In the
 event the Franchise Tax Board acts on the protest in part only, the remaining part of the protest shall continue to be under protest until the Franchise Tax Board acts on that part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 938, Sec. 87.   Effective January 1, 1996.   Operative July 1, 1997, by Sec. 98 of Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

19045.

(a) The Franchise Tax Board’s action upon the protest, whether in whole or in part, is final upon the expiration of 30 days from the date when it mails notice of its action to the taxpayer, unless within that 30-day period the taxpayer appeals in writing from the action of the Franchise Tax Board to the board.

(b) (1) The Franchise Tax Board’s notice of action upon protest shall include the date determined by the Franchise Tax Board as the last day on
 which the taxpayer may file an appeal with the board.

(2) Any appeal to the board filed by the taxpayer on or before the date for filing an appeal specified in the notice (pursuant to paragraph (1)) shall be treated as timely filed.

(c) This section shall apply to any notice mailed after December 31, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 12.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19046.

Two copies of the appeal and two copies of any supporting documents shall be addressed and mailed to the State Board of Equalization at Sacramento, California. Upon receipt of the appeal, the board shall provide one copy of the appeal and one copy of any supporting documents to the Franchise Tax Board at Sacramento, California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19047.

The board shall hear and determine the appeal and thereafter shall forthwith notify the taxpayer and the Franchise Tax Board of its determination and the reasons therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19048.

The board’s determination becomes final upon the expiration of 30 days from the time of the determination unless within the 30-day period the taxpayer or the Franchise Tax Board files a petition for rehearing with the board. In that event the determination becomes final upon the expiration of 30 days from the time the board issues its opinion on the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19049.

(a) When a deficiency is determined and the assessment becomes final, the Franchise Tax Board shall mail notice and demand to the taxpayer for the payment thereof. The deficiency assessed is due and payable at the expiration of 15 days from the date of the notice and demand.

(b) The amendments made by Chapter 600 of the Statutes of 1997 are operative for notices issued on or after January 1, 1998.

(c) The
 notice described in subdivision (a) shall be mailed in a manner that includes a postmark. For purposes of this subdivision, postmark means a postal marking made on a letter, package, or postcard indicating the date on which the item is delivered to the United States Postal Service.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision are operative for notices issued on or after January 1, 2008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 281, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

19050.

A certificate by the Franchise Tax Board or of the board, as the case may be, of the mailing of the notices specified in this article is prima facie evidence of the assessment of the deficiency and of the giving of the notices.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19051.

Any amount of tax in excess of that disclosed by the return, due to a mathematical error, notice of which has been mailed to the taxpayer, is not a deficiency assessment. The taxpayer has no right of protest or appeal based on that notice; however, the amount of tax erroneously omitted in the return may be assessed and collected in the manner provided in this part as in the case of deficiency assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19052.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part to the contrary, adjustments to refundable credits (including credits claimed on or after January 1, 2001, in accordance with Section 17052.6) may be made pursuant to Section 19054, and claimants shall have the right to claim a refund of adjusted amounts within the period provided in Section 19306, 19307, 19308, or 19311, whichever period expires later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 374, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19054.

(a) If on any return or claim for refund of taxes imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), there is an overstatement of the credit for income tax withheld, or of the amount paid as estimated income tax, the amount so overstated which is allowed against the tax shown on the return or which is allowed as a credit or refund may be assessed by the Franchise Tax Board in the same manner as is provided by Section 19051 in the case of a mathematical error
 appearing on the return.

(b) No unpaid amount of estimated tax under Section 19025 or 19136 shall be assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19057.

(a) Except in the case of a false or fraudulent return and except as otherwise expressly provided in this part, every notice of a proposed deficiency assessment shall be mailed to the taxpayer within four years after the return was filed. No deficiency shall be assessed or collected with respect to the year for which the return was filed unless the notice is mailed within the four-year period or the period otherwise provided. For purposes of this chapter, the term “return” means the return required to be filed by the taxpayer and does
 not include a return of any person from whom the taxpayer has received an item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit.

(b) The running of the period of limitations provided in subdivision (a) on mailing a notice of proposed deficiency assessment shall, in a case under Title 11 of the United States Code, be suspended for any period during which the Franchise Tax Board is prohibited by reason of that case from mailing the notice of proposed deficiency assessment and for 60 days thereafter.

(c) Where, within the 60-day period ending on the day on which the time prescribed in this section for the assessment of any tax imposed under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) for any taxable year would otherwise expire, the Franchise Tax Board receives a written document, other than an amended return or a report required by Section 18622,
 signed by the taxpayer showing that the taxpayer owes an additional amount of that tax for that taxable year, the period for the assessment of an additional amount in excess of the amount shown on either an original or amended return shall not expire before the day 60 days after the day on which the Franchise Tax Board receives that document.

(d) If a taxpayer determines in good faith that it is an exempt organization and files a return as an exempt organization under Section 23772, and if the taxpayer is thereafter held to be a taxable organization for the taxable year for which the return is filed, that return shall be deemed the return of the organization for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 175.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

19058.

(a) If the taxpayer omits from gross income an amount properly includable therein which is in excess of 25 percent of the amount of gross income stated in the return, a notice of a proposed deficiency assessment may be mailed to the taxpayer within six years after the return was filed. Additionally, in the case of a corporation, a proceeding in court for the collection of the tax may be commenced without assessment at any time within six years after the return was filed.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following shall apply:

(1) In the case of a trade or business, the term “gross income” means the total of the
 amounts received or accrued from the sale of goods or services (if the amounts are required to be shown on the return) prior to diminution by the cost of the sales or service.

(2) An understatement of gross income by reason of an overstatement of unrecovered cost or other basis is an omission from gross income. 

(3) In determining the amount omitted from gross income, other than in the case of an overstatement of unrecovered cost or other basis, there shall not be taken into account any amount which is omitted from gross income stated in the return if the amount is disclosed in the return, or in a statement attached to the return, in a manner adequate to apprise the Franchise Tax Board of the nature and amount of the item.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 231, Sec. 67.   (SB 711)   Effective October 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

19059.

(a) If a taxpayer is required by subdivision (a) of Section 18622 to report a change or correction by the Commissioner of Internal Revenue or other officer of the United States or other competent authority and does report the change or correction within six months after the final federal determination, or the Internal Revenue Service reports that change or correction within six months after the final federal determination, a notice of proposed deficiency
 assessment resulting from those adjustments may be mailed to the taxpayer within two years from the date when the notice is filed with the Franchise Tax Board by the taxpayer or the Internal Revenue Service, or within the periods provided in Section 19057, 19058, or 19065, whichever period expires later.
